Hawaii, session 2026, SB890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 486, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part V to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§486- Poi; labeling requirements. (a)  If a product labeled, marketed, or sold as "poi" contains ingredients wholly grown in the State, the product shall bear a label stating that the product is "100% Hawaii-grown." (b)  If a product labeled, marketed, or sold as "poi" contains any ingredient grown outside the State, the product shall bear a label stating: "This product contains ingredients grown outside Hawaii."; provided that the label shall further identify the origin of the ingredients used in the product. (c)  If this section or any provision of this section conflicts at any time with federal law, then the federal law shall prevail and this section or the relevant provisions of this section shall become ineffective and invalid.  The ineffectiveness or invalidity of this section or any of its provisions shall not affect any other provisions or applications of this chapter which shall be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this section are severable. (d)  For the purposes of this section, "ingredient" means something that enters into a compound or is a component part of any combination or mixture." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.